North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 21. Military Absentee Registration and Voting in Primary and General Elections. [Repealed]

§§ 163-245 through 163-250.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-182, s. 2, effective January 1, 2012.

History.
S. 163-245; 1941, c. 346, ss. 1, 1a; 1943, c. 503, s. 1; 1945, c. 758, s. 4; 1953, c. 908; 1963, c. 457, s. 16; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1973, c. 793, s. 71; 2001-466, s. 4(a); 2003-226, s. 19; 2006-192, s. 6; 2009-281, s. 1;
repealed by 2011-182, s. 2, effective January 1, 2012. s. 163-246; 1941, c. 346, ss. 7-10; 1943, c. 503, ss. 7, 8; 1963, c. 457, s. 15; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 2001-466, s. 4(b); repealed by 2011-182, s. 2, effective January 1, 2012. s.
163-247; 1941, c. 346, ss. 2, 3; 1943, c. 503, s. 2; 1963, c. 457, s. 12; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1977, c. 265, s. 16; 1987, c. 415, s. 1; 2001-466, s. 4(c), (d); 2003-226, s. 20; 2010-192, s. 1; repealed by 2011-182, s. 2, effective January
1, 2012. s. 163-248; 1929, c. 164, s. 39; 1941, c. 346, ss. 2-6; 1943, c. 503, s. 3; 1963, c. 457, ss. 12-14; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1973, c. 793, s. 72; 1975, c. 844, ss. 15-17; 1979, c. 411, s. 7; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 986, s.
2; 1987, c. 485, ss. 2, 5; c. 509, s. 9; c. 583, s. 5; 1989, c. 635, s. 5; 1999-456, s. 59; 2009-537, s. 1; repealed by 2011-182, s. 2, effective January 1, 2012. s. 163-249; 1941, c. 346, ss. 2-5; 1943, c. 503, s. 3; 1963, c. 457,
ss. 12, 13; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; repealed by 2011-182, s. 2, effective January 1, 2012. s. 163-250; 1941, c. 346, ss. 7-10; 1963, c. 457, s. 15; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1987, c. 583, s. 6; 2009-537, s. 7; repealed by 2011-182, s. 2, effective
January 1, 2012.

§ 163-251.

Recodified as

G.S. 163-258.26

.

§ 163-252.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 536, s. 5.

§§ 163-253 through 163-256.

Recodified as

G.S. 163-258.27

through 163-258.30, respectively.

§ 163-257.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-182, s. 2, effective January 1, 2012.

History.
1999-455, s. 20; 2004-127, s. 9(b); repealed by 2011-182, s. 2, effective January 1, 2012; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a).

§ 163-258.

Recodified as

G.S. 163-258.31

.